Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-216
New county; records; how made up.

The county clerk of the new county shall transcribe in books prepared for that purpose, from the records of the county or counties from which the new county is formed, all deeds, mortgages, leases, and title papers of every description, with the certificate of acknowledgment thereto, and the date of filing the same for record, of lands lying in the new county, which were previously recorded in the county or counties from which the new county was formed; and the clerk shall be allowed by such new county such compensation as his services are reasonably worth. The clerk of such new county shall also prepare a numerical index of the lands and lots in such new county in the same manner as county clerks are by law directed to prepare and keep such index.

Laws 1879, § 17, p. 358;

R.S.1913, § 927;

C.S.1922, § 833;

C.S.1929, § 25-216;

R.S.1943, § 22-216.

For numerical index form and contents, see sections 23-1513 and 23-1514.

First county clerk of newly organized county who compiles numerical index is entitled to compensation therefor. Bastedo v. Boyd County, 57 Neb. 100, 77 N.W. 387 (1898).